District of Columbia statutes.
38-204

Census of minors.

The Board, or its designee, shall conduct annually, or as frequently as may be found necessary or desirable, a complete census of all minors 3 years of age or more who permanently or temporarily reside in the District. The census record shall be amended from day to day as changes of residence occur among minors within the age group, as other persons come within or leave the age group, and as other persons within the age group become residents of or leave the District. The census record of minors shall give the full name, address, sex, and date of birth of each minor, the school attended by him or her and, if the minor is not at school, the name and address of his or her employer, if any, and the name, address, telephone numbers, if any, and occupation of each parent or guardian.

Feb. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 807, ch. 140, Art. II, § 1
renumbered as Art. II, § 3 and amended, Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-247, § 2(a), 38 DCR 376
Census duties of public charter schools, see § 38-1802.04.
Duties and responsibilities of charter schools under this section, see § 38-1702.05.
This section is referenced in § 38-1802.04, § 38-2605, and § 38-2901.
1981 Ed., § 31-404.
1973 Ed., § 31-208.